test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Other lexicons

Tests:

  Adjective - jagák: # AGAdj
    jagák+A+Attr: jagák 
    jagák+A+Sg+Nom: jagák
    jagák+A+Sg+Acc: jagágav
    jagák+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    jagák+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - tjårvak: # AGAdj
    tjårvak+A+Attr: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Nom: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Ine: tjårvagin
    tjårvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: tjårvakvuohta

  Adjective - gielak: # AGAdj
    gielak+A+Attr: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Nom: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Acc: gielagav 
    gielak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gielak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gilduk: # ALEK
    gilduk+A+Attr: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Nom: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Com: gildugijn 
    gilduk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gildugabbo
    gilduk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gildugamos

  Adjective - vuonnak: # AGAdj and BASSTEL
    vuonnak+A+Attr: [vuonnak, vuonnagis]
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Nom: vuonnak
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Gen: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Acc: vuonnagav
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ill: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ine: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ela: vuonnagis
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Com: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Nom: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Gen: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Acc: vuonnagijt
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ill: vuonnagijda
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ine: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ela: vuonnagijs
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Com: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Ess: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vuonnagabbo
    vuonnak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vuonnagamos


  Adjective - ahttse: # LEXATTR
    ahttse+A+Attr: ahttse
    ahttse+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ahttse+A+Sg+Com: []
    ahttse+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ahttse+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ahttse+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    ahttse+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    ahttse+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    ahttse+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: ahttsevuohta

  Adjective - biejvvegilgudam: # PrfPrc_At
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Attr: biejvvegilgudam
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Sg+Nom: biejvvegilgudam
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Sg+Com: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    biejvvegilgudam+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - guovtestávvalis: # STÁVAL 
    guovtestávvalis+A+Attr: guovtestávvalis 
    guovtestávvalis+A+Sg+Nom: guovtestávvalis 
    guovtestávvalis+A+Sg+Acc: guovtestávvalisáv 
    guovtestávvalis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávvalis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávvalis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávvalis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    guovtestávvalis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guovtestávvalisát
    guovtestávvalis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: guovtestávvalisvuohta

  Adjective - dåhkkimahtes: # AHTES and LEXATTR
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Attr: dåhkkimahtes
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dåhkkimahtesvuohta
    
  Adjective - avtelasj: # At 
    avtelasj+A+Attr: avtelasj 
    avtelasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    avtelasj+A+Sg+Acc: []
    avtelasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Adjective - gunnot: # At 
    gunnot+A+Attr: gunnot 
    gunnot+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gunnot+A+Sg+Acc: []
    gunnot+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    
